Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
57-3-106. Local option election — Municipalities where applicable — Supplemental voter registration — Restrictions on frequency of elections.

Except as provided in subsection (g), the voters of any county may, by local option election, permit the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages, within the territorial limits of such county, by a majority vote, at an election held as hereinafter provided, and, in the event of such permission, the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and possession of alcoholic beverages in such county are lawful; provided, that sales at retail as herein defined shall be made only in the municipalities in such county as herein defined, or within a civil district of such county, which district shall have a population of thirty thousand (30,000) persons or over, according to the federal census for the year 1950 or any subsequent census, but which civil district shall not have lying either wholly or partly within its boundaries a municipality as herein defined.

In like manner, the voters of any county, at any time while this chapter is in effect, may, by local option election, forbid the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and/or possession of alcoholic or intoxicating beverages, within the territorial limits of such county, by a majority vote, at an election to be held as hereinafter provided, and, in the event of such prohibition, the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and/or possession of alcoholic or intoxicating beverages in such county is unlawful; provided, that this does not apply to a bona fide manufacturer, actually engaged in manufacture under this chapter.

Except in counties having populations of:

not less than nor more than

12,100 12,200

23,500 24,000

65,000 70,000

according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the voters of any municipality in this state which has been incorporated under a general or special law or laws of this state for five (5) years or longer and which has a population of nine hundred twenty-five (925) or more persons, according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, except in municipalities with a population of not less than one thousand two hundred thirty (1,230) nor more than one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, in any county having a population of not less than thirteen thousand five hundred (13,500) nor more than thirteen thousand six hundred (13,600), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may, by local option election, permit the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and/or possession of alcoholic beverages within the territorial limits of such municipality by a majority vote, at an election held as hereinafter provided, and in the event of such permission, the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution and/or possession of alcoholic beverages in such municipality shall be, and become lawful, notwithstanding the fact that the county or any portion thereof in which such municipality is located has, or has not, voted to the contrary under any other provision of this chapter, and the same shall continue to be lawful until the same is forbidden by the voters of such municipality, by majority vote thereof, at a local option election held as hereinafter provided.

In like manner, the voters of any such municipality, at any time while this chapter is in effect, may, by local option election, forbid the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution, and/or possession of alcoholic or intoxicating beverages, within the territorial limits of the municipality, by a majority vote, at an election to be held as hereinafter provided, and in the event of such prohibition, the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, transportation, distribution, and/or possession of alcoholic or intoxicating beverages in the municipality is unlawful, notwithstanding the fact that the county or any portion thereof in which the municipality is located has or has not voted to the contrary under any other provision of this chapter; provided, that this does not apply to a bona fide manufacturer, actually engaged in manufacture under any law of this state.

Elections provided for in subsections (a) and (b) shall be called and held as elections on questions by the county election commission at the next regular election of the county or municipality, as the case may be, upon receipt of a petition signed by residents of the county or municipality, as the case may be, to a number amounting to ten percent (10%) or more of the votes cast in the county or municipality, as the case may be, for governor of the state of Tennessee at the then last preceding gubernatorial election, requesting the holding of such election. Except that, no election under this chapter may be placed on the same ballot or conducted on the same day of a primary election.

Such petition shall be addressed to the county election commission of such county, or county in which such municipality is located, and shall read, except for such address, substantially as follows:

We, registered voters of (here insert name of county or municipality, as the case may be), do hereby request the holding of a local option election to authorize retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages as provided by law.

Such petition may be in two (2) or more counterparts.

Registered voters of the county or municipality, as the case may be, may vote in the election. Ballots shall be in the form prescribed by the general election laws of the state, except as herein otherwise provided.

The questions submitted to the voters appearing thereon in county elections shall be in the following form:

To permit retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages in (Here insert name of county)

Not to permit retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages in (Here insert name of county)

The questions submitted to the voters appearing thereon in municipal elections shall be in the following form:

To permit retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages in (Here insert name of municipality)

Not to permit retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages in (Here insert name of municipality)

In county elections, the county election commission shall hold a prior supplemental registration, unless such election be at the time of a general election, such registration to be held at the time and in the manner prescribed by law for the holding of supplemental registration previous to the election for members of the general assembly.

The county election commission shall certify the results of the election to the county mayor in county elections and to the mayor of the municipality in municipal elections.

Not more than one (1) election in any such county or municipality shall be held under this chapter within any period of twenty-four (24) months, except that no election in an entire county or any portion thereof in which such municipality is located, held under this chapter, is an election held in such municipality within the meaning of this subdivision (f)(2).

Should any county or municipality thereof conduct a local option election under this chapter in conjunction with any general election, and the number of qualified votes cast negative to the local option proposition exceeds sixty percent (60%) of the total number of votes cast in the election, no further local option election in such county or municipality shall be held for a period of four (4) years from the date of such previous election. However, no election in an entire county or any portion thereof in which such municipality is located, held under this chapter, is an election held in such municipality within the meaning of this provision.

In those counties wherein are located municipalities which have a population equal to or greater than the smallest county in Tennessee by the federal census of 1960 or by any succeeding federal census, or any municipality having a population of one thousand seven hundred (1,700) or more persons, according to the 1960 federal census in which at least fifty percent (50%) of assessed valuation of the real estate in the municipality consists of hotels, motels, and tourist courts and accommodations, as shown by the tax assessment rolls or books of the municipality, the elections provided for in subsection (a) apply only to those portions of such county lying outside the corporate limits of such municipalities, it being the purpose and intent of this chapter that as to such counties no countywide election may be held in, nor shall its result affect, any such municipality, but whether or not the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, distribution, transportation and/or possession of alcoholic beverages shall be permitted or prohibited within the corporate limits of such municipalities shall be determined solely by separate local option elections held in each municipality as provided by subsection (b) hereof; provided, that in such counties wherein the manufacture, storage, sale, distribution, transportation, and/or possession of alcoholic beverages was legal on May 10, 1967, nothing herein shall affect the legality thereof in such counties and the municipalities thereof until the same shall be prohibited by separate local option elections held as provided in this section.

Elections may be called and held in such portions of such counties lying outside such municipalities in the same manner as is provided by subsection (a) for an entire county and with like effect, except that the results thereof shall be applicable only to those portions of such counties lying without the corporate limits of such municipalities. Petitioners for such elections and the voters participating therein shall reside within those portions of the county lying outside the corporate limits of such municipalities and shall be otherwise qualified as provided in this section. Where a majority of the voters participating in such election shall permit the manufacture, receipt, sale, storage, distribution, transportation and/or possession of alcoholic beverages within such portions of such counties, the same shall be and become lawful therein, but sales at retail shall be made only in such portions of such counties as are within the corporate limits of municipalities as the same are defined in § 57-3-101, except this subsection (g) shall likewise apply to any civil district which falls within subsection (a) and § 57-3-205.

Not more than one (1) such election shall be held in such portions of any county lying without the corporate limits of such municipalities within any period of twenty-four (24) months.

Should any portion of any county lying without the corporate limits of such municipalities conduct a local option election under the provisions of this chapter in conjunction with any general election, and the number of qualified votes cast negative to the local option proposition exceeds sixty percent (60%) of the total number of votes cast in the election, no further local option election in such portions of any county lying without the corporate limits of such municipalities shall be held for a period of four (4) years from the date of such previous election. However, no election in any such portion of a county, held under this chapter, is an election held in such municipalities within the meaning of this subdivision (g)(4).

When a municipality is located partly within a county that has a metropolitan form of government and the county has authorized retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages and partly within another county that has not authorized retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages, a referendum in the municipality shall be held only in that portion of the municipality located in the county that has not authorized retail package stores to sell alcoholic beverages. The referendum result shall not affect the sale of alcoholic beverages by retail package stores in the portion of the municipality located in the county having a metropolitan form of government.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than twenty-nine thousand four hundred (29,400) nor more than twenty-nine thousand five hundred (29,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by this section, then any municipality having a population of not less than five hundred thirty (530) nor more than five hundred thirty-nine (539), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located within the boundaries of such county, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(14) or subdivision (b)(1). The referendum shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by this section.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than forty-one thousand eight hundred (41,800) nor more than forty-one thousand nine hundred (41,900), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by this section, then any municipality having a population of not less than four hundred sixty (460) nor more than four hundred seventy (470), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located within the boundaries of such county, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(14) or subdivision (b)(1). The referendum must be conducted in the manner prescribed by this section.

If any municipality located in any county having a population of not less than sixty-six thousand two hundred (66,200) nor more than sixty-six thousand three hundred (66,300), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, has authorized the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in a referendum in the manner prescribed by this section, then any municipality having a population of not less than three hundred ten (310) nor more than three hundred nineteen (319), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, located within the boundaries of such county, may conduct a referendum to authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail within the corporate boundaries of such municipality, notwithstanding the population requirements of § 57-3-101(a)(14) or subdivision (b)(1). The referendum must be conducted in the manner prescribed by this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), in any county that has approved the sale at retail of alcoholic beverages, retail sales may be made within the boundaries of any property under the control of a property owners association that:

Includes at least four thousand (4,000) homes;

Contains three (3) golf courses, a country club, and a yacht club;

Is managed by a 501(c) nonprofit corporation;

Has more than one hundred (100) miles of roads maintained by the property owners association;

Has a volunteer fire department;

Has more than one hundred (100) people employed by the property owners association;

Has a utility system maintained by the property owners association;

Is located on the banks of Tellico Reservoir; and

Is located in any county having a population not less than forty-eight thousand five hundred (48,500) and not more than forty-eight thousand six hundred (48,600), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the commission may issue a retailer's license to any 501(c) nonprofit corporation described in subdivision (l )(1)(C) if such nonprofit corporation approves having a retail licensee within the boundaries of its property upon a majority vote of the board for such nonprofit corporation.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 16; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.8 (Williams, § 6648.19); Acts 1951, ch. 52, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1951, ch. 75, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1953, ch. 88, § 1; Acts 1963, ch. 390, § 1; 1967, ch. 215, § 1; 1971, ch. 70, § 8; 1972, ch. 502, § 1; 1972, ch. 612, § 8; 1972, ch. 640, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; Acts 1975, ch. 112, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 358, § 1; 1977, ch. 174, §§ 1, 2; 1978, ch. 627, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 21, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-111; Acts 1981, ch. 381, §§ 1-3; 1982, ch. 551, §§ 1-5; 1992, ch. 711, § 2; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2011, ch. 116, § 1; 2015, ch. 201, § 1; 2018, ch. 692, § 1; 2018, ch. 891, § 1; 2018, ch. 1027, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13. and its supplement.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2 directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 692 added (j).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 891 added (k).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 1027 added (l ).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 692 § 3. April 9, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 891, § 3. May 3, 2018.

Acts 2018, ch. 1027, § 3. May 21, 2018.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 6, 28.

Attorney General Opinions. Because a county previously approved liquor-by-the-drink sales through a county-wide referendum, this referendum made such sales legal within a city meeting the definition of a municipality under T.C.A. §57-3-101; further, the exclusion of certain municipalities from the effects of a county-wide referendum as described in T.C.A. §57-3-106(g)(1) did not apply to the city because its population is, and always has been, smaller than the least populous county according to the 1960 and subsequent censuses, OAG 02-092 (8/28/02).

Even though sales of liquor by the drink were legal in a city, as a result of a previous county referendum, the voters of the city could, through a referendum, prohibit such sales, OAG 02-092 (8/28/02).

Participation of the municipality as a whole is required in a referendum to approve liquor by the drink, OAG 06-113 (7/19/06).

Consumption of alcoholic beverages on the premises in unincorporated areas of a county, OAG 09-011 (2/3/09).

Constitutionality of rule limiting advertising of alcoholic beverages. OAG 13-46, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (6/17/2013).

57-3-107. Counties in which no election held — Counties voting against local option — Effect — Transportation of intoxicating liquors through dry counties.

In the several counties, or portions thereof, and in the several municipalities wherein separate local option election may be held under the provisions hereof, in which no local option election is held, or, if held, a majority of votes cast therein are against local option, then as to that county or portion thereof, or municipality, nothing in this chapter shall be so construed as to modify in any respect the statutes now in force relating to the manufacture, sale, transportation, and/or possession of intoxicating liquors, but the same shall remain in full force and effect.

It shall be lawful to transport alcoholic beverages through such counties in which no local option election is held, or if the election is held and the majority of votes cast therein are against local option, if, in either such case, such beverages are in sealed bottles or containers, and are moving from a duly licensed manufacturer to a licensed wholesaler, or from a wholesaler to a licensed retailer, and such shipment is accompanied by a bill of lading or other instrument in writing showing the destination of such alcoholic beverages.

Whenever any county or municipality wherein traffic in alcoholic beverages has been legalized, shall, by a majority vote in a local option election held as set out herein, prohibit such traffic, all licensed dealers in such county or municipality shall have ninety (90) days from the final determination of the results of the election to dispose of their stocks of alcoholic beverages and wind up their businesses.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.9 (Williams, § 6648.20); Acts 1951, ch. 138, § 2; 1967, ch. 215, § 2; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-112.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, § 6.

57-3-108. District commissions — Members — Appointment — Term of office — Qualifications — Vacancies — Service without compensation.

Whenever any civil district of any county of the state shall by virtue of § 57-3-205 meet the requisites for the licensing of retail liquor stores to be located within such district the secretary of state, state treasurer and comptroller of the treasury, or a majority of them, shall appoint a three-member commission composed of citizens and residents of the civil district involved, which commission shall be vested with all the powers and duties with respect to the sale of alcoholic beverages within such district which may under state law be vested in the mayor and/or board of aldermen of a municipality of the state, including the right to limit the number of such stores and to limit the permissible locations within such district where such stores may be situated.

Members of such commission shall serve until the next biennial election in August occurring more than thirty (30) days after such civil district shall be brought within the requirements of this chapter for the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail, at which time their successors shall be elected.

The qualifications required of a member of such commission shall be the same as those for the magistrates of such district, and the qualifications of those entitled to vote for such commissioners shall be the same as those required for voters for the office of magistrate of such district.

The term of office of all the members of the commission shall be for two (2) years, or until their successors are duly elected and take office. All vacancies on the commission shall be filled by the appointment of the secretary of state, state treasurer and comptroller of the treasury, or a majority of them, and such appointment shall be for the unexpired term of the member whose vacancy is being filled.

The members of the commission shall serve without compensation and shall have no interest, financial or otherwise, in any retail or wholesale liquor store or distillery.

In the event the terms of office of the members of the commission shall have expired, that is, that they shall have served the two (2) years for which they were originally elected, and as many as one (1) biennial election has been held without the voters having an opportunity to elect the members of the commission because no names were printed on the ballot, then the terms of the members of the commission shall be automatically terminated and a new commission shall be designated with all the rights and powers attaching to the commission herein. In such event the members of the commission shall be appointed by a board composed of the secretary of state, state treasurer and comptroller of the treasury in the same case as otherwise provided for filling vacancies.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 9a, as added by Acts 1951, ch. 52, § 4 (Williams, § 6648.12a1); 1955, ch. 244, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 6, 8.

57-3-109. Damaged or unaccepted goods — Liability for tax.

When any common carrier transporting alcoholic beverages to a point within this state, or any insurance company insuring such alcoholic beverages, comes into possession of such alcoholic beverages by virtue of the same being damaged or otherwise unaccepted by the consignee of such alcoholic beverages, such common carrier or insurance company shall become liable for the tax imposed under this chapter, unless proof deemed satisfactory to the commissioner of revenue is furnished to the commissioner by such carrier or insurer showing that such alcoholic beverages have been destroyed or shipped to a point without this state and, therefore, have not been sold or consumed in this state.

Acts 1971, ch. 150, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-169.

57-3-110. Sale of liquors to armed forces agencies.

Any wholesaler, manufacturer, or distiller may sell intoxicating liquors to any post exchange, ship's service store, mess, club, or commissary of any post, camp, station or reservation of the armed forces, or any other agency authorized by the department of defense to engage in the sale of intoxicating liquors.

Before any person shall transport (other than by common carrier) alcoholic beverages within, into, or through this state, for delivery to any such ship's service store, mess, club, commissary, or other agency under the jurisdiction of the department of defense, such person shall comply with § 57-3-403, and any other law applicable to the transporting of alcoholic beverages, and shall, in addition thereto, procure from the alcoholic beverage commission a special permit in such form as may be prescribed by the commission, which application, among other things, shall state the name and location of the post exchange, ship's service store, mess, club, commissary, or other agency to which the delivery will be made, the route over which such shipment will be hauled, and the amount to be transported according to the separate containers making up such shipment.

Before any common carrier shall transport alcoholic beverages within, into or through this state for delivery to a post exchange, ship's service store, mess, commissary, club or other agency under the jurisdiction of the department of defense, notice of such shipment shall be given to the alcoholic beverage commission, which notice shall include, among other things, the name and location of the consignee, the route over which such shipment will be transported, and the amount to be transported according to the separate containers making up such shipment.

It is herein declared to be the legislative intent to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages to post exchanges and similar agencies under the jurisdiction of the department of defense on military or naval reservations and posts within the boundaries of this state by wholesalers, manufacturers, and distilleries only upon strict compliance with this section, § 57-3-403 and all other sections applicable to the transportation of alcoholic beverages within, into, or through this state.

Acts 1955, ch. 347, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 14; impl. am. Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 49; T.C.A., § 57-151.

57-3-111. Appropriation for enforcement of law.

There is appropriated from state license and permit fees a sum sufficient for the salaries, cost, expenses, operation and enforcement of this chapter, subject to an allotment by the commissioner of finance and administration, with the approval of the governor, but in no event shall the allotment made by the commissioner exceed the amount of fees collected under this chapter.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 9b, as added by Acts 1949, ch. 284, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.14b (Williams, § 6648.12b); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-149.

57-3-112. Partial invalidity of law — Operation and effect.

If the referendum election provisions of this chapter, or any part thereof, as contained in §57-3-106 or elsewhere, be held unconstitutional, or invalid, void, or ineffective, for any reason, in whole or in part, this chapter must fail as such provisions shall not be severable, and no part of this chapter would have been passed without such provisions being contained therein as valid provisions.

Acts 1939, ch. 49, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 6648.23 (Williams, § 6648.21); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 57-150.